Florida, session 2026, SB416.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 22 23 Section 1.âSection 552.445, Florida Statutes, is created to 24 read: 25 552.445âProperty damage caused by limestone mining 26 operations; legislative findings and intent.â 27 (1)âThe Legislature finds that: 28 (a)âLimestone mining for aggregate is an essential 29 component of this stateâs economy, contributing to 30 infrastructure development and construction by providing a cost 31 effective source of concrete. 32 (b)âLimiting limestone mining operations would result in 33 increased costs of construction, adversely affecting this 34 stateâs economy and its residents. 35 (2)âThe Legislature also recognizes the concerns of 36 residents in Northwest Miami-Dade County and Southwest Broward 37 County, who have reported property damage resulting from ground 38 vibrations caused by nearby limestone mining operations. 39 (3)âIt is the intent of the Legislature to provide a fair 40 and equitable remedy for property owners who can prove that 41 their property damage was caused by nearby limestone mining 42 operations. 43 Section 2.âSection 552.4451, Florida Statutes, is created 44 to read: 45 552.4451âDefinitions.âAs used in ss. 552.445-552.4454, the 46 term: 47 (1)ââClaimantâ means a property owner who files a claim for 48 compensation for property damage caused by limestone mining 49 operations. 50 (2)ââDivisionâ means the Division of Administrative 51 Hearings. 52 (3)ââGround vibrationsâ means seismic activity in the 53 ground caused by the use of explosives, heavy machinery, or 54 other mining operations involved in limestone extraction or 55 processing. Such activity may be mechanically detected by 56 seismographic monitoring or other means within a radius of up to 57 3 miles from the point of origin. 58 (4)ââLimestone mining operationâ means the extraction and 59 processing of limestone for use in concrete aggregate which 60 results in ground vibrations. 61 (5)ââProperty damageâ means any physical damage to a 62 structure, a foundation, or property caused by ground vibrations 63 or a related impact resulting from limestone mining operations. 64 (6)ââProperty ownerâ means an individual or entity holding 65 title to real property in this state. 66 Section 3.âSection 552.4452, Florida Statutes, is created 67 to read: 68 552.4452âClaims; statute of limitations.â 69 (1)âA property owner whose property is located within a 3 70 mile radius of limestone mining operations who has sustained 71 property damage as a result of such operations has the right to 72 file a claim for compensation. 73 (2)âA claim for compensation must include all of the 74 following: 75 (a)âEvidence of property ownership. 76 (b)âEvidence of property damage. 77 (c)âEvidence linking the property damage to the limestone 78 mining operations, including, but not limited to, mechanical 79 detection of ground vibrations. 80 (3)âA claim brought under this section must be filed within 81 2 years after the date the property damage was discovered or 82 reasonably should have been discovered. 83 Section 4.âSection 552.4453, Florida Statutes, is created 84 to read: 85 552.4453âAdjudication of claims.â 86 (1)âClaims brought under s. 552.4452 shall be adjudicated 87 by the division. 88 (2)âThe division shall: 89 (a)âConduct a hearing to determine the validity of a claim. 90 (b)âAllow for the presentation of evidence, including, but 91 not limited to, expert testimony, vibration monitoring data, and 92 structural evaluations. 93 (3)âThe claimant must demonstrate by the greater weight of 94 the evidence that the property damage was caused by limestone 95 mining operations. 96 (4)âThe administrative law judge shall issue a finding of 97 facts and determine if the claimant has demonstrated competent 98 and substantial evidence to prove by the greater weight of the 99 evidence that the property damage was caused by limestone mining 100 operations. 101 Section 5.âSection 552.4454, Florida Statutes, is created 102 to read: 103 552.4454âAppropriation and compensation.â 104 (1)âThe Legislature shall appropriate each fiscal year from 105 the General Revenue Fund moneys to the Insurance Regulatory 106 Trust Fund to ensure the prompt payment of compensation awarded 107 by an administrative law judge under s. 552.4453. 108 (2)(a)âIf a claim is upheld by the administrative law judge 109 under s. 553.4453, the state must compensate the claimant for 110 costs to repair structural damage to the claimantâs property. 111 (b)âCompensation amounts are determined based on the market 112 rates for such repair costs. 113 Section 6.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.